Arkansas, session 2025, SB488.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 9-27-303(15), concerning the definition of
"delinquent juvenile" under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to
read as follows:
(15) “Delinquent juvenile” means:
(A) A a juvenile who was ten (10) years of age old or
older at the time the juvenile who:
(i)(A) Has committed Committed an act, other than a
traffic offense or game and fish violation, that, if the act had been
committed by an adult, would subject the adult to prosecution for a felony,
misdemeanor, or violation under the applicable criminal laws of this state;
(ii)(B) Has violated Violated § 5-73-119; or,
(iii) Has violated § 5-71-217(d)(2), cyberbullying of
a school employee or another criminal law or status offense that can only be
committed by a juvenile under the laws of this state; or
*LJH204*
04-03-2025 09:36:00 LJH204

As Engrossed: S4/3/25 SB488
(B)(C) Any juvenile charged with capital murder, § 5-10-
101, or murder in the first degree, § 5-10-102, subject Committed an offense
which later results in to an extended juvenile jurisdiction designation;

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 9-27-303(33), concerning the definition of
"juvenile" under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, is amended to read as
follows:
(33) “Juvenile” means an individual who is:
(A) From Is from birth to eighteen (18) years of age,
whether married or single; or
(B) Was under eighteen (18) years of age at the time a
delinquent offense occurred but has since reached the age of majority; or
(C) Adjudicated Was adjudicated delinquent, a juvenile
member of a family in need of services, or dependent or dependent-neglected
by the juvenile division of circuit court prior to eighteen (18) years of age
and for whom the juvenile division of circuit court retains jurisdiction;

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 9-28-206 is amended to read as follows:
9-28-206. Disposition of delinquent juvenile.
(a) When a circuit court or any other court having jurisdiction of a
juvenile under eighteen (18) years of age finds a delinquent juvenile
committed a to be delinquent act while under eighteen (18) years of age as
defined by the laws of this state, the court may commit the juvenile to the
Division of Youth Services for an indeterminate period not to exceed the
twenty-first birthday of the juvenile.
(b) No court may commit a juvenile found solely in criminal contempt
to the division Division of Youth Services.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 9-28-208(a)(1), concerning what shall be
included in an order of commitment to the Division of Youth Services, is
amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) An order of commitment to the Division of Youth Services shall
state that the juvenile is found to be adjudicated a delinquent juvenile and
shall state information regarding the underlying facts of the adjudication.

/s/Irvin
04-03-2025 09:36:00 LJH204